Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF31.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1355YH (2) 91 jm/jh H.F. 31 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 422.12Q New resident tax credit. 1 1. a. For purposes of this section, ânew residentâ means an 2 individual who became a resident of Iowa upon taking full-time 3 employment in this state, who remains a resident of and 4 employed full-time in this state while claiming the credit, and 5 who has not been a resident of this state at any time during the 6 previous twelve-month period prior to establishing residency 7 in this state. 8 b. For purposes of this section, âpublic assistanceâ means 9 the supplemental nutrition assistance program, the Medicaid 10 program, or the family investment program. 11 2. a. The taxes imposed under this division less the 12 credits allowed under section 422.12 shall be reduced by a new 13 resident tax credit equal to one hundred percent of the taxes 14 imposed in a tax year for up to four consecutive tax years. 15 b. An individual may claim the credit during either the 16 first or second tax year of residency, and shall take the 17 credit consecutively every tax year thereafter as provided in 18 paragraph âaâ . 19 c. An individual is eligible to take the credit one time in 20 the individualâs lifetime. If an individual is unable to claim 21 the credit in consecutive tax years, the individual shall be 22 ineligible to claim the credit in a future tax year. 23 3. Any new resident tax credit in excess of the tax 24 liability is not refundable. 25 4. An individual claiming the credit may claim an exemption 26 from withholding on the state W-4 form. 27 5. Married taxpayers electing to file separate returns may 28 avail themselves of the new resident tax credit by allocating 29 the new resident tax credit to each spouse in the proportion 30 that each spouseâs respective earned income bears to the total 31 combined earned income. 32 6. An individual shall not be eligible to claim the credit 33 if the person is receiving public assistance after the first 34 tax year the credit is claimed. 35 -1- LSB 1355YH (2) 91 jm/jh 1/ 5 H.F. 31 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 422.12R New graduate tax credit. 1 1. a. For purposes of this section, ânew graduateâ means 2 an individual who is a recent graduate from an Iowa-based 3 community college, college, university, or an apprenticeship 4 program as defined in section 84E.2, who is a resident of and 5 employed in this state, and who is thirty years of age or less 6 during the first tax year when claiming the tax credit. 7 b. For purposes of this section, âpublic assistanceâ means 8 the supplemental nutrition assistance program, the Medicaid 9 program, or the family investment program. 10 2. a. The taxes imposed under this division less the 11 credits allowed under section 422.12 shall be reduced by a new 12 graduate tax credit equal to one hundred percent of the taxes 13 imposed in a tax year for up to four consecutive tax years. 14 b. An individual may claim the tax credit during either the 15 first or second tax year after graduation, and shall take the 16 credit consecutively every tax year thereafter as provided in 17 paragraph âaâ . 18 c. An individual is eligible to take the credit one time in 19 the individualâs lifetime. If an individual is unable to claim 20 the credit in consecutive tax years, the individual shall be 21 ineligible to claim the credit in a future tax year. 22 3. Any new graduate tax credit in excess of the tax 23 liability is not refundable. 24 4. An individual claiming the credit may claim an exemption 25 from withholding on the state W-4 form. 26 5. Married taxpayers electing to file separate returns may 27 avail themselves of the new graduate tax credit by allocating 28 the new graduate tax credit to each spouse in the proportion 29 that each spouseâs respective earned income bears to the total 30 combined earned income. 31 6. An individual shall not be eligible to claim the credit 32 if the person is receiving public assistance after the first 33 tax year the credit is claimed. 34 Sec. 3. CONTINGENT FUTURE REPEAL ââ CODE EDITOR DIRECTIVE 35 -2- LSB 1355YH (2) 91 jm/jh 2/ 5 H.F. 31 ââ APPLICABILITY AFTER REPEAL. 1 1. Sections 422.12Q and 422.12R are repealed January 1 2 following the occurrence of the statewide average annual 3 unemployment rate equaling or exceeding four percent for three 4 consecutive calendar years as calculated by the United States 5 department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, beginning 6 with calendar year 2025. The director of the department of 7 workforce development or the directorâs designee shall notify 8 the Code editor when the annual statewide unemployment rate 9 exceeds four percent for three consecutive calendar years as 10 set forth in this subsection. 11 2. If the Code editor is notified by the director of the 12 department of workforce development or the directorâs designee 13 that the condition in subsection 1 has been satisfied, the Code 14 editor is directed to remove sections 422.12Q and 422.12R from 15 the Code. 16 3. A taxpayer claiming the tax credit in section 422.12Q or 17 422.12R prior to repeal pursuant to subsection 2 is eligible 18 to claim the credit after the repeal up to any remaining tax 19 years the taxpayer would have been eligible to claim prior to 20 the repeal, as long as the taxpayer remains eligible to claim 21 the credit under the law prior to repeal. 22 Sec. 4. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 23 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 24 or after that date. 25